lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numerio rėmelio apsaugos nuo vagystės konstrukcija: Užrakinami varžtų dangteliai; Neapsaugotas nuo vagysčių; Vienos krypties varžtai; Suderinamas su apsauginėmis tvirtinimo detalėmis; Su apsauginiais varžtais; Kita
zh-CN: 车牌框防盗设计: 锁定螺丝帽; 非防盗; 单向螺丝; 兼容安全紧固件; 含防篡改螺丝; 其他
hr-HR: Dizajn okvira registarske pločice vozila s protuprovalnim djelovanjem: Poklopci vijaka s mogućnošću zaključavanja; Nije protiv krađe; Jednosmjerni vijci; Kompatibilno sa sigurnosnim pričvršćivačima; Uključeni vijci otporni na neovlaštene preinake; Ostalo
ro-RO: Designul antifurt al suportului plăcuței de înmatriculare auto: Capace cu blocare pentru șuruburi; Fără protecție antifurt; Șuruburi cu sens unic; Compatibil cu elemente de fixare de siguranță; Șuruburi antiefracție incluse; Altele
ru: Противоугонная конструкция рамки номерного знака: Запирающиеся колпачки винтов; Без защиты от кражи; Винты одностороннего действия; Совместимость с секретным крепежом; Винты с защитой от вскрытия в комплекте; Другое
nb: Tyverisikringsdesign for nummerskiltramme: Låsbare skruedeksler; Ikke tyverisikker; Enveisskruer; Kompatibel med sikkerhetsfeste; Sabotasjesikre skruer inkludert; Annet
da: Tyverisikringsdesign for nummerpladeramme: Låseskruedæksler; Ikke tyverisikret; Envejsskruer; Kompatibel med sikkerhedsbeslag; Tyverisikre skruer medfølger; Andet
tr: Araç plaka çerçevesi hırsızlığa karşı tasarımı: Kilitli vida kapakları; Hırsızlık koruması yok; Tek yönlü vidalar; Güvenlik bağlantı elemanıyla uyumlu; Müdahaleye karşı korumalı vidalar dahil; Diğer
hu: Jármű rendszámtábla Lopásgátló kialakítású Frame: Zárható csavarkupakok; Nem lopásgátló; Egyirányú csavarok; Biztonsági rögzítőkkel kompatibilis; Szabotázsvédett csavarok mellékelve; Egyéb
pl: Konstrukcja antykradzieżowa ramki tablicy rejestracyjnej pojazdu: Nakładki zabezpieczające na śruby; Brak zabezpieczenia przed kradzieżą; Śruby jednokierunkowe; Kompatybilne z elementami mocującymi chroniącymi przed kradzieżą; Zawiera śruby odporne na manipulacje; Inne
de: Diebstahlschutzdesign des Kennzeichenrahmens: Abschließbare Schraubenkappen; Nicht diebstahlsicher; Einwegschrauben; Kompatibel mit Sicherheitsschrauben; Manipulationssichere Schrauben inklusive; Sonstiges
it: Design antifurto del telaio della targa del veicolo: Copriviti di bloccaggio; Non antifurto; Viti unidirezionali; Compatibile con fissaggi di sicurezza; Viti antimanomissione incluse; Altro
el: Αντικλεπτικός σχεδιασμός πλαισίου πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Καπάκια βιδών με κλειδαριά; Χωρίς αντικλεπτικό σχεδιασμό; Βίδες μίας κατεύθυνσης; Συμβατό με βίδες ασφαλείας; Περιλαμβάνονται βίδες ασφαλείας (tamper-proof); Άλλο
fr: Conception antivol du cadre de plaque d’immatriculation: Caches-vis de verrouillage; Non antivol; Vis à sens unique; Compatible avec fixations de sécurité; Vis inviolables incluses; Autre
cs: Zabezpečení registrační značky vozidla: Zajišťovací krytky šroubů; Bez ochrany proti krádeži; Jednocestné šrouby; Kompatibilní s bezpečnostními spojovacími prvky; Včetně šroubů odolných proti neoprávněné manipulaci; Jiné
zh-TW: 車牌框防盜設計: 防盜螺絲蓋; 非防盜; 單向螺絲; 相容於防盜緊固件; 包含防篡改螺絲; 其他
vi: Xe tem nhãn định danh Frame thiết kế chống trộm: Nắp vít có khóa; Không chống trộm; Vít một chiều; Tương thích ốc vít bảo vệ; Kèm ốc vít chống tháo; Khác
pt-BR: Moldura de placa veicular design antifurto: Tampas de parafuso com trava; Sem sistema antifurto; Parafusos de sentido único; Compatível com fixador de segurança; Parafusos invioláveis incluídos; Outro
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisterikilven kehys: Lukittuvat ruuvien suojukset; Ei varkaudenestoa; Yksisuuntaiset ruuvit; Yhteensopiva turvakiinnikkeiden kanssa; Sisältää peukaloinnin estävät ruuvit; Muu
ko: 차량 번호판 프레임 도난 방지 설계: 잠금식 나사 캡; 도난 방지 기능 없음; 단방향 나사; 보안 패스너 호환; 변조 방지 나사 포함; 기타
ja: 車両用ライセンスプレートフレーム盗難防止設計: ロック式スクリューキャップ; 盗難防止機能なし; ワンウェイねじ; セキュリティファスナー対応; いじり止めねじ付属; その他
nl: Voertuigkentekenplaathouder antidiefstalontwerp: Vergrendelbare schroefdoppen; Geen antidiefstal; Eénrichtingsschroeven; Compatibel met veiligheidsbevestigingsmiddelen; Inclusief veiligheidsschroeven; Overig
es: Diseño antirrobo del marco de la placa de identificación del vehículo: Tapas de tornillos de bloqueo; No antirrobo; Tornillos unidireccionales; Compatible con sujetadores de seguridad; Tornillos a prueba de manipulaciones incluidos; Otro
bg-BG: Дизайн против кражба на рамката за регистрационен номер на превозно средство: Заключващи капачки за винтове; Без защита против кражба; Еднопосочни винтове; Съвместим със защитни крепежни елементи; Включени винтове със защита срещу манипулация; Друго
sk-SK: Rámček na evidenčné číslo vozidla s ochranou proti krádeži: Uzamykacie krytky skrutiek; Bez ochrany proti krádeži; Jednosmerné skrutky; Kompatibilné s bezpečnostnými skrutkami; Vrátane skrutiek proti manipulácii; Iné
sv: Stöldskyddsdesign för fordonsregistreringsskyltsram: Låsbara skruvlock; Ej stöldskydd; Envägsskruvar; Kompatibel med säkerhetsfästen; Inkluderar manipuleringssäkra skruvar; Övrigt
en: Vehicle license plate frame anti-theft design: Locking screw caps; Not anti-theft; One-way screws; Security fastener compatible; Tamper-proof screws included; Other
th: การออกแบบกรอบป้ายทะเบียนรถที่ป้องกันการโจรกรรม: ฝาครอบสกรูล็อก; ไม่กันขโมย; สกรูทางเดียว; รองรับตัวยึดนิรภัย; รวมสกรูนิรภัย; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Design antirroubo da placa de matrícula do veículo: Tampas de parafusos de bloqueio; Não é antirroubo; Parafusos unidirecionais; Compatível com fechos de segurança; Inclui parafusos invioláveis; Outro
sl-SI: Standard tablice za okvir registrske tablice vozila: Pokrovčki za vijake s ključavnico; Ni proti kraji; Enosmerni vijaki; Združljivo z varnostnimi pritrdilnimi elementi; Priloženi vijaki, zaščiteni pred nepooblaščenimi posegi; Drugo